Connecticut, session 2026, SB00374.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective from passage) Not later than January 1,
2 2027, the Division of State Police within the Department of Emergency
3 Services and Public Protection shall, in conjunction with the Department
4 of Mental Health and Addiction Services, expand the pilot program
5 known as the CRISIS Initiative: Connection to Recovery through
6 Intervention, Support and Initiating Services throughout the state.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
PS Joint Favorable
SB374 / File No. 300 1

SB374 File No. 300
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill requires the Department of Emergency Services and Public
Protection (DESPP), in conjunction with the Department of Mental
Health and Addiction Services, to expand the CRISIS program
statewide by January 1, 2027.
PA 25-168, the FY 26 and FY 27 Budget, provides funding for DESPP
to expand the CRISIS program statewide beginning in FY 27, therefore
the agency is expected to meet the requirements of the bill within its
anticipated resources.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB374 / File No. 300 2

SB374 File No. 300
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 374
AN ACT CONCERNING THE EXPANSION OF THE CRISIS
INITIATIVE PILOT PROGRAM THROUGHOUT THE STATE.